Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Department for Human Resources

199.810.
Establishment of department — Commissioner. [Repealed.]

199.820.
Children’s Advisory Council. [Repealed.]

199.830.
Terms of original council members. [Repealed.]

199.840.
Functions of council. [Repealed.]

199.850.
Transfer of functions and facilities to department. [Repealed.]

199.860.
Child welfare funds. [Repealed.]

199.870.
Conformity to merit system. [Repealed.]

199.880.
Transition duties of commissioner of finance. [Repealed.]

199.890.
Relationship with aid to dependent children program. [Repealed.]